North Dakota, session 69, HB1576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - OIL AND GAS TAX REVENUE
ALLOCATION FORMULAS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall
consider studying the oil and gas tax revenue allocation formulas. The study must include
consideration of current and historical allocations to political subdivisions and the appropriate
level of oil and gas tax revenue allocations to political subdivisions based on infrastructure and
other oil- and gas-related development impact needs. The legislative management shall report
its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.1298.01000